Hawaii statutes.
§342P-22 Negligent violations.
Any person who negligently violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the
department pursuant to this chapter, or any condition in a permit or variance
issued under this chapter, shall be fined not less than $2,500 nor more than
$25,000 per day for each violation or imprisoned for not more than one year, or
both. If a conviction of a person is for a violation committed after a first
conviction of the person under this section, punishment shall be a fine of not
more than $50,000 per day for each violation or imprisonment of not more than
two years, or both. [L 1991, c 219, pt of §1; am L 1998, c 242, §10]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next